Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. LEGISLATURE

CHAPTER 303. GOVERNOR FOR A DAY AND SPEAKER'S DAY

Sec. 303.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Governor for a day ceremony" means a ceremony held during a state senator's tenure as president pro tempore to honor the senator for the senator's service to the state.

(2) "Speaker's reunion day ceremony" means a ceremony held to honor former members of the house of representatives for their service to the state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995.

Sec. 303.002. CHAIRMAN. (a) Before any contributions are accepted or any expenditures are made for a governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony, the president pro tempore or the speaker, as appropriate, shall designate a chairman to be responsible for conducting the ceremony.

(b) The chairman is responsible for filing each report required by this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 2, eff. April 20, 1995.

Sec. 303.003. CONTRIBUTIONS. (a) An individual, association, corporation, or other legal entity may contribute funds, services, or other things of value to defray the expenses of the governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony. A contribution under this subsection is not a political contribution for purposes of state law regulating political contributions or prohibiting political contributions by corporations or labor organizations.

(b) The chairman shall keep a record of each contribution received to defray the expenses of the governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony.

(c) Contributions from a contributor to the speaker's reunion day ceremony may not exceed an aggregate of $1,000 cash or an aggregate value of more than $1,000.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 3, eff. April 20, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 420, Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1250 (H.B. 4181), Sec. 18, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 303.004. EXPENDITURES. (a) The chairman may authorize the expenditure of funds for:

(1) printing;

(2) employment of staff;

(3) professional and consultant fees;

(4) postage, telephone, and telegraph expenses; and

(5) any other purpose reasonably related to conducting the governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony, including fund raising.

(b) The chairman shall keep a record of each expenditure related to the governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 4, eff. April 20, 1995.

Sec. 303.005. FINAL REPORT. (a) Not later than the 60th day after the date on which the governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony occurs, the chairman shall file with the Texas Ethics Commission a final report indicating:

(1) the name and address of each contributor of more than $50;

(2) the amount of each contribution of more than $50;

(3) whether a contribution of more than $50 was in cash or in kind;

(4) the total of all contributions of $50 or less;

(5) the total of all contributions received;

(6) the name and address of each entity to which an expenditure of more than $50 was made;

(7) the amount of each expenditure of more than $50;

(8) the purpose of each expenditure of more than $50;

(9) the total of all expenditures of $50 or less; and

(10) the total of all expenditures.

(b) If there is an outstanding debt when the final report is filed, the chairman shall file a supplemental report not later than the 30th day after the date on which the debt is retired indicating the information required by Subsection (a) from the time of the final report to the filing of the supplemental report.

(c) If each obligation has been paid at the end of the 60-day period and there is an outstanding balance, the chairman shall:

(1) distribute the balance to one or more charities designated by the president pro tempore or speaker; or

(2) retain the balance in an account established for that purpose in the name of the office of the president pro tempore or speaker, as appropriate.

(d) If the outstanding balance is retained under Subsection (c)(2), the account balance shall be combined with contributions received for the succeeding governor for a day or speaker's reunion day ceremony, as appropriate, and may be spent only for the purposes provided by Section 303.004.

(e) The reports required by this chapter are public information.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 5, eff. April 20, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 507, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 420, Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2001.